Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-201
Right of privacy; legislative intent.

It is the intention of the Legislature to provide a right of privacy as described and limited by sections 20-201 to 20-211 and 25-840.01, and to give to any natural person a legal remedy in the event of violation of the right.

Laws 1979, LB 394, § 1.